Maryland, session 2026, SB0461.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Human Services
5–506.
(a) In this section, “standard utility allowance” means a Maryland Energy
Assistance Program payment to a household that is at least $21 per year.
(b) (1) There is a Heat and Eat Program within the Supplemental Nutrition
Assistance Program in the Department.
(2) The purpose of the Heat and Eat Program is to expand food access to
households that are receiving or eligible for Supplemental Nutrition Assistance Program
benefits.
(c) (1) A household is eligible to participate in the Heat and Eat Program if
the household:
(I) is eligible to receive Supplemental Nutrition Assistance Program
benefits under State and federal law; AND
(II) INCLUDES AN ELDERLY OR DISABLED INDIVIDUAL.
(2) In determining the eligibility of a household to receive Supplemental
Nutrition Assistance Program benefits, the Department shall apply a standard utility
allowance to the shelter deduction that is used for the purpose of determining countable
gross income for Supplemental Nutrition Assistance Program eligibility.
(d) The Department shall adopt regulations:
(1) to verify household eligibility for participation in the Heat and Eat
Program; and
(2) otherwise necessary to carry out this section.
(a) The Department of Human Services shall study and make recommendations
on the potential number of households excluded from automatic standard utility allowance
eligibility for the Heat and Eat Program within the Supplemental Nutrition Assistance
Program due to enactment of the federal One Big Beautiful Bill Act of 2025.

SENATE BILL 461 3
(b) In conducting the study described in subsection (a) of this section, the
Department shall:
(1) compile information on the number of households that qualified for
automatic standard utility allowance eligibility for the Heat and Eat Program in each of
fiscal years 2024 and 2025, and for the portion of fiscal year 2026, before enactment of the
federal One Big Beautiful Bill Act of 2025, including:
(i) the average monthly payment to each household;
(ii) the number of households in each county;
(iii) the number of households with a member who is at least 60 years
old; and
(iv) the number of households with a member who is disabled;
(2) identify the number of households included under paragraph (1) of this
subsection that are no longer eligible for the automatic standard utility allowance for the
Heat and Eat Program due to enactment of the federal One Big Beautiful Bill Act of 2025,
including:
(i) the number of households in each county;
(ii) the number of households that qualify for the standard utility
allowance based on verified energy expenses; and
(iii) the total dollar amount of the benefits households would have
received if they had remained eligible;
(3) identify the number of households included under paragraph (1) of this
subsection with a member who is at least 60 years old or who has a disability, including:
(i) the number of households in each county;
(ii) the number of households that qualify for the standard utility
allowance based on automatic enrollment or separately based on verified energy expenses;
and
(iii) the dollar amount of the benefits;
(4) identify the number of households included under paragraph (1) of this
subsection that experienced a reduction of Supplemental Nutrition Assistance Program
benefits because the energy assistance payment may not be counted as income due to the
enactment of the federal One Big Beautiful Bill Act of 2025, including:
(i) the number of households in each county; and

SENATE BILL 461
(ii) the dollar amount of the reduced benefits;
(5) evaluate and discuss any other impacts of the reduction of energy
assistance benefits on households that are no longer eligible to receive the nominal benefit
due to the enactment of the federal One Big Beautiful Bill Act of 2025, including impacts for
new applicants; and
(6) evaluate the administrative cost and logistics related to the
Department’s efforts to provide additional assistance to households with eligibility
verification based on energy expenses to individuals no longer eligible for automatic
standard utility allowance eligibility for the Heat and Eat Program due to enactment of the
federal One Big Beautiful Bill Act of 2025.
(c) On or before December 1, 2026, the Department of Human Services shall
submit a report of its findings and recommendations to the Senate Budget and Taxation
Committee and the House Appropriations Committee in accordance with § 2–1257 of the
State Government Article.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October July 1, 2026.
Approved:
________________________________________________________________________________
Governor.
________________________________________________________________________________
President of the Senate.
________________________________________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Delegates.